Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-304
Right-of-way; acquisition; crop damage.

Any such public power district, corporation or municipality acquiring any easement or right-of-way hereunder shall be liable to the owner of the land affected for any damage to growing crops not included in the original settlement or award.

Laws 1927, c. 107, § 2, p. 296;

C.S.1929, § 70-402;

R.S.1943, § 70-304;

Laws 1969, c. 545, § 3, p. 2200.